dictionaries/gl_ES/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 111 0 chenoslla . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chenosllas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chenosllo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chenosllos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chenosvos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 111 0 chenosvola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chenosvolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chenosvolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chenosvolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chenoslles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo + dativo P6
SFX 111 0 chenosllela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chenosllelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chenosllelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chenosllelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 111 0 chevola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevoslle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo P3
SFX 111 0 chevoslla . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevosllas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevosllo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevosllos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevosnos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 111 0 chevosnola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevosnolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevosnolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevosnolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevoslles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo P6
SFX 111 0 chevosllela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevosllelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chevosllelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chevosllelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chelles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6
SFX 111 0 chellela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chellelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chellelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chellelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chellesnos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 111 0 chellesnola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chellesnolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chellesnolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chellesnolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 chellesvos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 111 0 chellesvola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 chellesvolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 chellesvolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 chellesvolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 lleme . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo / acusativo P1
SFX 111 0 llema . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 llemas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 llemo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 llemos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 llenos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 111 0 llenola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 111 0 llenolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 111 0 llenolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 111 0 llenolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 111 0 llevos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 111 0 llevola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P1 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
